Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-3297
District; recreation area; regulate real and personal property; violation; penalty.

(1) A district may provide for the protection, use, or removal of any public real or personal property in a recreation area and may regulate or prohibit the construction or installation of any privately owned structure in a recreation area. Except as otherwise provided in section 2-3290.01, a district may close all or any portion of a recreation area to any form of public use or access with the erection of appropriate signs, without the adoption and promulgation of formal written rules and regulations.

(2) Any person who, without the permission of the district, damages, destroys, uses, or removes any public real or personal property in a recreation area, constructs or installs any privately owned structure in a recreation area, or enters or remains upon all or any portion of a recreation area when appropriate signs or public notices prohibiting such activity have been erected or displayed shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1984, LB 861, § 9;

Laws 2006, LB 1113, § 17.